Hawaii statutes.
§132-3 Adoption of state fire code.
The state fire council shall, after public hearings pursuant to chapter 91,
adopt a state fire code setting forth minimum requirements relative to the
protection of persons and property from fire loss including without
limitation: (1) the storage, handling and use of hazardous substances,
materials and devices; and (2) the control of conditions hazardous to life or
property in the design, use or occupancy of buildings and premises. The state
fire code shall become part of the Hawaii state building codes as provided in
section 107-25. The state fire council shall meet annually to review and amend
the state fire code. [L 1941, c 176, §§1, 4; RL 1945, §8527; RL 1955, §184-3;
am L 1965, c 96, §126; HRS §132-3; am L 1978, c 241, §2(3); am L 2001, c 55, §6;
am L 2008, c 18, §1; am L 2014, c 164, §10]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next